California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(f) Whenever a minor is recommended for placement at a state developmental center, the regional center director or designee shall submit a report to the Director of the Department of Developmental Services or his or her designee. The regional center report shall include the assessments, individual program plan, and a statement describing the necessity for a developmental center placement. The Director of Developmental Services or his or her designee may, within 60 days of receiving the regional center report, submit to the court a written report evaluating the ability of an alternative community option or a developmental center to achieve the purposes of treatment for the minor and whether a developmental
 center placement can adequately provide the security measures or systems required to protect the public health and safety from the potential dangers posed by the minor’s known behaviors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 265, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

714.

A regional center, as described in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Division 4.5, shall not be required to provide assessments or services to minors pursuant to Section 711, 712, or 713 solely on the basis of a finding by the court under subdivision (c) of Section 712 that the minor is developmentally disabled. Regional center representatives may, at their option and on a case-by-case basis, participate in the multidisciplinary teams described in Section 713. However, any assessment provided by or through a regional center to a minor determined by the court
 to be developmentally disabled under subdivision (c) of Section 712 shall be provided in accordance with the provisions and procedures in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Division 4.5 that relate to regional centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 265, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Wards—Judgments and Orders [725. - 742.]

725.

After receiving and considering the evidence on the proper disposition of the case, the court may enter judgment as follows:

(a) If the court has found that the minor is a person described by Section 601 or 602, by reason of the commission of an offense other than any of the offenses set forth in Section 654.3, it may, without adjudging the minor a ward of the court, place the minor on probation, under the supervision of the probation officer, for a period not to exceed six months. The minor’s probation shall include the conditions required in Section 729.2 except in any case in which the court makes a finding and states on the record its reasons that any of those conditions would be inappropriate. If the offense involved the unlawful possession, use, or furnishing of a controlled substance, as defined in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code, a violation of subdivision (f) of Section 647 of the Penal Code, or a violation of Section 25662 of the Business and Professions Code, the minor’s probation shall include the conditions required by Section 729.10. If the minor fails to comply with the conditions of probation imposed, the court may order and adjudge the minor to be a ward of the court.

(b) If the court has found that the minor is a person described by Section 601 or 602, it may order and adjudge the minor to be a ward of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1117, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

725.5.

In determining the judgment and order to be made in any case in which the minor is found to be a person described in Section 602, the court shall consider, in addition to other relevant and material evidence, (1) the age of the minor, (2) the circumstances and gravity of the offense committed by the minor, and (3) the minor’s previous delinquent history.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1090, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

726.

(a) In all cases in which a minor is adjudged a ward or dependent child of the court, the court may limit the control to be exercised over the ward or dependent child by any parent or guardian and shall, in its order, clearly and specifically set forth all those limitations, but no ward or dependent child shall be taken from the physical custody of a parent or guardian, unless upon the hearing the court finds one of the following facts:

(1) That the parent or guardian is incapable of providing or has failed or neglected to provide proper maintenance, training, and education for the minor.

(2) That the minor has been tried on probation while in custody and has failed to reform.

(3) That the welfare of the minor requires that custody be taken from the minor’s parent or guardian.

(b) Whenever the court specifically limits the right of the parent or guardian to make educational or developmental services decisions for the minor, the court shall at the same time appoint a responsible adult to make educational or developmental services decisions for the child until one of the following occurs:

(1) The minor reaches 18 years of age, unless the child chooses not to make educational or developmental services decisions for themselves, or is deemed by the court to be incompetent.

(2) Another responsible adult is appointed to make educational or developmental services decisions for the minor pursuant to this section.

(3) The right of the parent or guardian to make educational or developmental services decisions for the minor is fully restored.

(4) A successor guardian or conservator is appointed.

(5) The child is placed into a planned permanent living arrangement pursuant to paragraph (5) or (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 727.3, at which time, for educational decisionmaking, the foster parent, relative caretaker, or nonrelative extended family member, as defined in Section 362.7, has the right to represent the child in educational matters pursuant to Section 56055 of the Education Code, and for decisions relating to developmental services, unless the court specifies otherwise, the foster parent, relative caregiver, or nonrelative extended family member of the planned permanent living arrangement has the right to represent the
 child in matters related to developmental services.

(c) An individual who would have a conflict of interest in representing the child, as specified under federal regulations, may not be appointed to make educational decisions. The limitations applicable to conflicts of interest for educational rights holders shall also apply to authorized representatives for developmental services decisions pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4701.6. For purposes of this section, “an individual who would have a conflict of interest” means a person having any interests that might restrict or bias their ability to make educational or developmental services decisions, including, but not limited to, those conflicts of interest prohibited by Section 1126 of the Government Code, and the receipt of compensation or attorneys’ fees for the provision of services pursuant to this section. A foster parent may not be deemed to have a conflict of interest solely because
 the foster parent receives compensation for the provision of services pursuant to this section.

(1) If the court limits the parent’s educational rights pursuant to subdivision (a), the court shall determine whether there is a responsible adult who is a relative, nonrelative extended family member, or other adult known to the child and who is available and willing to serve as the child’s educational representative before appointing an educational representative or surrogate who is not known to the child.

If the court cannot identify a responsible adult who is known to the child and available to make educational decisions for the child and paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) do not apply, and the child has either been referred to the local educational agency for special education and related services or has a valid individualized education program, the court shall refer the child to the
 local educational agency for appointment of a surrogate parent pursuant to Section 7579.5 of the Government Code.

(2) All educational and school placement decisions shall seek to ensure that the child is in the least restrictive educational programs and has access to the academic resources, services, and extracurricular and enrichment activities that are available to all pupils. In all instances, educational and school placement decisions shall be based on the best interests of the child. If an educational representative or surrogate is appointed for the child, the representative or surrogate shall meet with the child, shall investigate the child’s educational needs and whether those needs are being met, and shall, before each review hearing held under Article 10 (commencing with Section 360), provide information and recommendations concerning the child’s educational needs to the child’s social worker, make written recommendations to the court,
 or attend the hearing and participate in those portions of the hearing that concern the child’s education.

(3) Nothing in this section in any way removes the obligation to appoint surrogate parents for students with disabilities who are without parental representation in special education procedures as required by state and federal law, including Section 1415(b)(2) of Title 20 of the United States Code, Section 56050 of the Education Code, Section 7579.5 of the Government Code, and Rule 5.650 of the California Rules of Court.

If the court appoints a developmental services decisionmaker pursuant to this section, they shall have the authority to access the child’s information and records pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 4514 and paragraph (23) of subdivision (a) of Section 5328, and to act on the child’s behalf for the purposes of the individual program plan process pursuant to Sections 4646,
 4646.5, and 4648 and the fair hearing process pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 4700) of Division 4.5, and as set forth in the court order.

(d) (1) If the minor is removed from the physical custody of the minor’s parent or guardian as the result of an order of wardship made pursuant to Section 602, the order shall specify that the minor may not be held in physical confinement for a period in excess of the middle term of imprisonment which could be imposed upon an adult convicted of the offense or offenses which brought or continued the minor under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

(2) As used in this section and in Section 731, “maximum term of imprisonment” means the middle of the three time periods set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, but without the need to follow the provisions of subdivision
 (b) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code or to consider time for good behavior or participation pursuant to Sections 2930, 2931, and 2932 of the Penal Code, plus enhancements which must be proven if pled.

(3) If the court elects to aggregate the period of physical confinement on multiple counts or multiple petitions, including previously sustained petitions adjudging the minor a ward within Section 602, the “maximum term of imprisonment” shall be the aggregate term of imprisonment specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1170.1 of the Penal Code, which includes any additional term imposed pursuant to Section 667, 667.5, 667.6, or 12022.1 of the Penal Code, and Section 11370.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) If the charged offense is a misdemeanor or a felony not included within the scope of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, the “maximum term of imprisonment” is the middle term of
 imprisonment prescribed by law.

(5) “Physical confinement” means placement in a juvenile hall, ranch, camp, forestry camp or secure juvenile home pursuant to Section 730, or in a secure youth treatment facility pursuant to Section 875, or in any institution operated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice.

(6) This section does not limit the power of the court to retain jurisdiction over a minor and to make appropriate orders pursuant to Section 727 for the period permitted by Section 607.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 222.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

726.4.

(a) At the disposition hearing, in any case where the court orders the care, custody, and control of the minor to be under the supervision of the probation officer for foster care placement pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 727, the court shall inquire of the mother and any other appropriate person as to the identity and address of all presumed or alleged fathers. The presence at the hearing of a man claiming to be the father shall not relieve the court of its duty of inquiry. The inquiry may include all of the following:

(1) Whether a judgment of paternity already exists.

(2) Whether the mother was married or believed she was married at the time of conception of the child or at any time thereafter.

(3) Whether the mother was cohabiting with a man at the time of conception or birth of the child.

(4) Whether the mother has received support payments or promises of support with respect to the child or in connection with her pregnancy.

(5) Whether any man has formally or informally acknowledged or declared his possible paternity of the child.

(6) Whether paternity tests have been administered and the results, if any.

(b) If, after the court inquiry, one or more men are identified as an alleged father, each alleged father shall be provided notice at his last and usual place of abode by certified mail return receipt requested alleging that he is or could be the father of the child. The notice shall state that the child is the subject of proceedings under Section 602 and that the proceedings could result in the termination of parental rights and adoption of the child. Nothing in this section shall preclude a court from terminating a father’s parental rights even if he appears at the hearing and files an action under Section 7630 or 7631 of the Family Code.

(c) The court may determine that the failure of an alleged father to return the certified mail receipt is not good cause to continue a hearing pursuant to Section 682.

(d) If a man appears in the delinquency action and files an action under Section 7630 or 7631 of the Family Code, the court shall determine if he is the father.

(e) After a petition has been filed to declare a minor a ward of the court, and until the time that the petition is dismissed, wardship is terminated, or parental rights are terminated pursuant to Section 727.31, the juvenile court which has jurisdiction of the wardship action shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear an action filed under Section 7630 or 7631 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 997, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

726.5.

(a) At any time when (1) the minor is a ward of the juvenile court under Section 725, or the court terminates wardship while the minor remains under the age of 18 years, and (2) proceedings for dissolution of marriage, for nullity of marriage, or for legal separation of the minor’s parents, proceedings to determine custody of the child, or to establish paternity of the minor under the Uniform Parentage Act, Part 3 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 12 of the Family Code are pending in the superior court of any county, or an order has been entered with regard to the custody of the minor, the juvenile court may issue a protective order as provided in Section 213.5 or as defined in Section 6218 of the Family Code and may issue an order determining parentage, custody of, or visitation with, the minor.

A custody or visitation order issued by the juvenile court pursuant to this subdivision shall be made in accordance with the procedures and criteria of Part 2 (commencing with Section 3020) of Division 8 of the Family Code. An order determining parentage issued by the juvenile court pursuant to this subdivision shall be made in accordance with the procedures and presumptions of the Uniform Parentage Act, Part 3 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 12 of the Family Code.

(b) If the juvenile court decides to issue an order pursuant to subdivision (a), the juvenile court shall provide notice of that decision to the superior court in which the proceeding to decide parentage, custody of, or visitation with, the minor is pending. The clerk of the superior court, upon receipt of the notice, shall file the notice with other documents and records of the pending proceeding and send by first-class mail a copy of the notice to all parties of record in that proceeding.

(c) Any order issued under this section shall continue until modified or terminated by a subsequent order of the juvenile court. The order of the juvenile court shall be filed in the proceeding for nullity, dissolution, or legal separation, or in the proceeding to determine custody or to establish paternity, if that proceeding is pending at the time the juvenile court terminates its jurisdiction over the minor. The order shall then become a part of that proceeding and may be terminated or modified as the court in that proceeding deems appropriate.

(d) If no action is filed or pending relating to the custody of the minor in the superior court of any county at the time the juvenile court terminates its jurisdiction over the minor, the juvenile court order entered pursuant to subdivision (a) may be used as the sole basis for opening a file in the superior court of the county in which the parent who has been awarded physical custody resides. The clerk of the juvenile court shall transmit the order to the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the order is to be filed. The clerk of the superior court shall, upon receipt, open a file, without a filing fee, and assign a case number.

(e) The clerk of the superior court shall, upon the filing of any juvenile court order pursuant to subdivision (d), send by first-class mail a copy of the order with the case number, to the juvenile court and to the parents at the address listed on the order.

(f) The Judicial Council shall adopt forms for orders issued under this section. These orders shall not be confidential.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 390, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

727.

(a) (1) If a minor or nonminor is adjudged a ward of the court on the ground that the minor or nonminor is a person described by Section 601 or 602, the court may make any reasonable orders for the care, supervision, custody, conduct, maintenance, and support of the minor or nonminor, including medical treatment, subject to further order of the court.

(2) In the discretion of the court, a ward may be ordered to be on probation without supervision of the probation officer. The court, in so ordering, may impose on the ward any and all reasonable conditions of behavior as may be appropriate under this disposition. A minor or nonminor who has been adjudged a ward of
 the court on the basis of the commission of any of the offenses described in subdivision (b) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 707, Section 459 of the Penal Code, or subdivision (a) of Section 11350 of the Health and Safety Code, shall not be eligible for probation without supervision of the probation officer. A minor or nonminor who has been adjudged a ward of the court on the basis of the commission of an offense involving the sale or possession for sale of a controlled substance, except misdemeanor offenses involving marijuana, as specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code, or of an offense in violation of Section 32625 of the Penal Code, shall be eligible for probation without supervision of the probation officer only if the court determines that the interests of justice would best be served and states reasons on the record
 for that determination.

(3) In all other cases, the court shall order the care, custody, and control of the minor or nonminor to be under the supervision of the probation officer.

(4) It is the responsibility, pursuant to Section 672(a)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, of the probation agency to determine the appropriate placement for the ward once the court issues a placement order. In determination of the appropriate placement for the ward, the probation officer shall consider any recommendations of the child and family. In an Indian child custody proceeding as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 224.1, the provisions of Section 361.31 shall apply. The probation agency may place the minor or nonminor in any of the following:

(A) The approved home of a relative or the approved home of a nonrelative, extended family member as defined in Section
 362.7, or, in an Indian child custody proceeding, an extended family member as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 224.1. If a decision has been made to place the minor in the home of a relative, the court may authorize the relative to give legal consent for the minor’s medical, surgical, and dental care and education as if the relative caregiver were the custodial parent of the minor.

(B) A foster home, the approved home of a resource family as defined in
 Section 16519.5, a tribally approved home as described by subdivision (r) of Section 224.1 and Section 10553.12, or a home or facility as described in Section 361.31 and Section 105 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915).

(C) A suitable licensed community care facility, as identified by the probation officer, except a youth homelessness prevention center licensed by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 1502.35 of the Health and Safety Code.

(D) A foster family agency, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 11400 and paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, in a suitable certified family home or with a resource family.

(E) A minor or nonminor dependent may be placed in a group home vendored by a regional center pursuant to Section 56004 of Title 17 of the
 California Code of Regulations or a short-term residential therapeutic program, as defined in subdivision (ad) of Section 11400 and paragraph (18) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code. The placing agency shall also comply with requirements set forth in paragraph (9) of subdivision (e) of Section 361.2, that includes, but is not limited to, authorization, limitation on length of stay, extensions, and additional requirements related to minors. For youth 13 years of age or older, the chief probation officer of the county probation department, or their designee, shall approve the placement if it is longer than 12 months, and no less frequently than every 12 months thereafter.

(F) (i) A minor adjudged a ward of the juvenile court shall be entitled to participate in age-appropriate extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities. A state or local regulation or policy shall not prevent, or create barriers to, participation in those activities. Each state and local entity shall ensure that private agencies that provide foster care services to wards have policies consistent with this section and that those agencies promote and protect the ability of wards to participate in age-appropriate extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities. A short-term residential therapeutic program or a group home administrator, a facility manager, or their responsible designee, and a caregiver, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 362.04, shall use a reasonable and prudent parent standard, as
 defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 362.04, in determining whether to give permission for a minor residing in foster care to participate in extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities. A short-term residential therapeutic program or a group home administrator, a facility manager, or their responsible designee, and a caregiver shall take reasonable steps to determine the appropriateness of the activity taking into consideration the minor’s age, maturity, and developmental level. For every minor placed in a setting described in subparagraphs (A) through (E), inclusive, age-appropriate extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities shall include access to computer technology and the internet.

(ii) A short-term residential therapeutic program or a group home administrator, facility manager, or their responsible
 designee, is encouraged to consult with social work or treatment staff members who are most familiar with the minor at the group home or short-term residential therapeutic program in applying and using the reasonable and prudent parent standard.

(G) For nonminors, an approved supervised independent living setting, as defined in Section 11400, including a residential housing unit certified by a licensed transitional housing placement provider.

(5) The minor or nonminor shall be released from juvenile detention upon an order being entered under paragraph (3), unless the court determines that a delay in the release from detention is reasonable pursuant to Section 737.

(b) (1) To facilitate
 coordination and cooperation among agencies, the court may, at any time after a petition has been filed, after giving notice and an opportunity to be heard, join in the juvenile court proceedings any agency that the court determines has failed to meet a legal obligation to provide services to a minor, for whom a petition has been filed under Section 601 or 602, to a nonminor, as described in Section 303, or to a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400. In any proceeding in which an agency is joined, the court shall not impose duties upon the agency beyond those mandated by law. The purpose of joinder under this section is to ensure the delivery and coordination of legally mandated services to the minor. The joinder shall not
 be maintained for any other purpose. Nothing in this section shall prohibit agencies that have received notice of the hearing on joinder from meeting prior to the hearing to coordinate services.

(2) The court has no authority to order services unless it has been determined through the administrative process of an agency that has been joined as a party, that the minor, nonminor, or nonminor dependent is eligible for those services. With respect to mental health assessment, treatment, and case management services pursuant to an individualized education program developed pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 56320) of Chapter 4 of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, the court’s determination shall be limited to whether the agency has complied with that chapter.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, “agency” means any governmental agency or any private service provider or individual that receives federal, state, or local governmental funding or reimbursement for providing services directly to a child, nonminor, or nonminor dependent.

(c) If a minor has been adjudged a ward of the court on the ground that the minor is a person described in Section 601 or 602, and the court finds that notice has been given in accordance with Section 661, and if the court orders that a parent or guardian shall retain custody of that minor either subject to or without the supervision of the probation officer, the parent or guardian may be required to participate with that minor in a counseling or education program, including, but not limited to, parent education and parenting programs operated by
 community colleges, school districts, or other appropriate agencies designated by the court.

(d) (1) The juvenile court may direct any reasonable orders to the parents and guardians of the minor who is the subject of any proceedings under this chapter as the court deems necessary and proper to carry out subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), including orders to appear before a county financial evaluation officer, to ensure the minor’s regular school attendance, and to make reasonable efforts to obtain appropriate educational services necessary to meet the needs of the minor.

(2) If counseling or other treatment services are ordered for the minor, the parent, guardian, or foster parent shall be ordered to participate in those services, unless participation by the parent, guardian,
 or foster parent is deemed by the court to be inappropriate or potentially detrimental to the minor.

(e) The court may, after receipt of relevant testimony and other evidence from the parties, affirm or reject the placement determination. If the court rejects the placement determination, the court may instruct the probation department to determine an alternative placement for the ward, or the court may modify the placement order to an alternative placement recommended by a party to the case after the court has received the probation department’s assessment of that recommendation and other relevant evidence from the parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 22.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

727.05.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 727, the probation agency may make an emergency placement of a minor ordered into its care, custody, and control with a relative or nonrelative extended family member.

(b) Prior to making the emergency placement, the probation agency shall do all of the following:

(1) Conduct an in-home inspection to assess the safety of the home and the ability of the relative or nonrelative extended family member to care for the minor’s needs.

(2) Ensure that a state-level criminal records check is conducted by
 an appropriate government agency through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) pursuant to Section 16504.5 for all of the following:

(A) Any person over 18 years of age living in the home of the relative or nonrelative extended family member who seeks emergency placement of the minor, excluding any person who is a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400.

(B) At the discretion of the probation agency, any person over 18 years of age known to the agency to be regularly present in the home, other than any professional providing professional services to the minor.

(C) At the discretion of the agency, any person over 14 years of age living in the home who the agency
 believes may have a criminal record, excluding any child who is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

(3) Conduct a check of allegations of prior child abuse or neglect concerning the relative or nonrelative extended family member and other adults in the home.

(c) (1) If the CLETS information that is obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) indicates that a person has no criminal record, the probation agency may place the minor in the home on an emergency basis.

(2) If the CLETS information obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) indicates that a person has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (B) or (D) of paragraph (2)
 of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the minor shall not be placed in the home unless a criminal records exemption has been granted using the exemption criteria specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a minor may be placed on an emergency basis if the CLETS information obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) indicates that the person has been convicted of an offense not described in subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, pending a criminal records exemption decision based on live scan fingerprint results if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The
 conviction does not involve an offense against a child.

(B) The chief probation officer, or their designee, determines that the placement is in the best interests of the minor.

(C) No party to the case objects to the placement.

(4) If the CLETS information obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) indicates that the person has been arrested for any offense described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the minor shall not be placed on an emergency basis in the home until the investigation required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code has been completed and the chief probation officer, or their designee, and the court have
 considered the investigation results when determining whether the placement is in the best interests of the child.

(5) If the CLETS information obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) indicates that the person has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the minor shall not be placed in the home on an emergency basis.

(6) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (5), or the placement recommendation of the county probation agency, the court may authorize the placement of a child on an emergency basis in the home of a relative, regardless of the status of any criminal record exemption or resource family approval, if the court finds that the placement does not pose a risk
 to the health and safety of the child.

(d) If the relative or nonrelative extended family member has not submitted an application for approval as a resource family at the time of the emergency placement, the probation agency shall require the relative or nonrelative extended family member to submit the application and initiate the home environment assessment no later than five business days after the emergency placement.

(e) Unless the fingerprint clearance check has already been initiated, the probation agency shall ensure that, within five days of the emergency placement, a fingerprint clearance check of the relative or nonrelative extended family member and any other person whose criminal record was obtained pursuant to this section is initiated through the Department of
 Justice to ensure the accuracy of the criminal records check conducted through the CLETS and to ensure criminal record clearance of the relative or nonrelative extended family member and all adults in the home pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 16519.5 and any associated written directives or regulations.

(f) An identification card from a foreign consulate or foreign passport shall be considered a valid form of identification for conducting a criminal records check pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 687, Sec. 10.   (SB 354)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

727.1.

(a) If the court orders the care, custody, and control of the minor to be under the supervision of the probation officer for foster care placement pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 727, the decision regarding choice of placement, pursuant to Section 706.6, shall be based upon selection of a safe setting that is the least restrictive or most family-like, and the most appropriate setting that meets the individual needs of the minor and is available, in proximity to the parent’s home, consistent with the selection of the environment best suited to meet the minor’s special needs and best interests. The selection shall consider, in order of priority, placement with relatives, tribal members, and foster family, group care, and residential
 treatment pursuant to Section 7950 of the Family Code. In an Indian child custody proceeding, the selection shall comply with the placement preferences set forth in Section 361.31.

(b) Unless otherwise authorized by law, the court shall not order the placement of a minor who is adjudged a ward of the court on the basis that the ward is a person described by either Section 601 or 602 in an out-of-state residential facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code, unless the court finds, in its order of placement and based on evidence presented by the county probation department, that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The out-of-state residential facility is licensed or certified for the placement of children by an agency of the state in which the
 ward will be placed.

(2) The out-of-state residential facility has been certified by the State Department of Social Services or is exempt from that certification, pursuant to Section 7911.1 of the Family Code.

(3) On and after July 1, 2021, the county probation department has fulfilled its responsibilities as set forth in Sections 4096 and 16010.9.

(4) The court has reviewed the documentation of any required assessment, technical assistance efforts, or recommendations and finds that in-state facilities or programs are unavailable or inadequate to meet the needs of the ward.

(c) If, upon inspection, the probation officer of the county in which the minor is
 adjudged a ward of the court determines that the out-of-state facility or program is not in compliance with the standards required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) or has an adverse impact on the health and safety of the minor, the probation officer may temporarily remove the minor from the facility or program. The probation officer shall promptly inform the court of the minor’s removal, and shall return the minor to the court for a hearing to review the suitability of continued out-of-state placement. The probation officer shall, within one business day of removing the minor, notify the State Department of Social Services’ Compact Administrator, and, within five working days, submit a written report of the findings and actions taken.

(d) The court shall review each of these placements for compliance with the requirements of subdivision
 (b) at least once every six months.

(e) The county shall not be entitled to receive or expend any public funds for the placement of a minor in an out-of-state group home or short-term residential therapeutic program, unless the conditions of subdivisions (b) and (d) are met.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after July 1, 2022, the court shall not order or approve any new placement of a minor by a county probation department in an out-of-state residential facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code, except for placements described in subdivision (h) of Section 7911.1 of the Family Code.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the court shall order any minor placed out of state by a
 county probation department in an out-of-state residential facility, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code, to be returned to California no later than January 1, 2023, except for placements described in subdivision (h) of Section 7911.1 of the Family Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 23.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

727.12.
